test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-plex_skerreeh_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup


Tests:

  
  Noun - skerreeh: # really not checked
    skerreeh+N+Sg+Nom: skerre ; 				
    skerreeh+N+Pl+Nom: skerreeh K ;			
    skerreeh+N+Pl+Gen: skerrei K ; 			
    skerreeh+N+Pl+Acc: skerreid K ; 			
    skerreeh+N+Pl+Ill: skerreid K ;	
    skerreeh+N+Pl+Loc: skerrein K ; 			
    skerreeh+N+Pl+Com: skerreiguin K ;		
    skerreeh+N+Pl+Abe: skerreittáá K ; 	
